Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Aviation shall conduct a  study developing a
plan for strategic investment for airports in this state.
(2) In conducting the study, the department shall consult the following stakeholders:
(a) The State Resilience Officer;
(b) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(c) The Department of Transportation; and
(d) The Oregon Airport Management Association.
(3) The plan for strategic investment developed under this section  must include, but need
not be limited to, the following components:
(a) Development of  a tiered system of designation of the following categories for airports
of geographic or functional significance:
(A) Tier 1 facilities that can be, and should be, prepared for providing  event assistance,
limited response support and immediate post-event flight activities.
(B) Tier 2 facilities  that can be, and should be, prepared for providing event assistance,
limited response support and return to flight activities within one month post-event.
(C) Tier 3 facilities that can be, and should be,  prepared for providing event assistance,
including limited response support, and return  to flight activities within three months post-
event.
(D) Special function facilities as outlined in state plans related to resilience.
(b) Priorities for preplacement of  standardized critical equipment and a process for
standardization of equipment.
(c) Identification of potential partnerships for mission-specific activities in support  of
Oregon’s statewide resilience posture.
(d) Identification of  baseline equipment for designated response and recovery facilities,
including at least the following:
(A) Generators.
(B) Resilient fuel distribution and storage.
(C) Shelters.
(D) Communications equipment.
(E) Potable water and sanitation facilities.
Enrolled House Bill 3058 (HB 3058-A) Page 1
(4) The Oregon  Department of Aviation shall submit a report in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to transportation no later than January 1, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3058 (HB 3058-A) Page 2